Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-408
County veterans service officer; officers and employees; oath; bond.

Each county veterans service officer appointed under the provisions of section 80-407 and every other person entrusted with the funds of a county service committee shall qualify by taking the usual oath of office and shall each give bond in the sum of one thousand dollars, with corporate surety, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duty. The premiums for such bonds shall be paid by the county.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 16, p. 934.